Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-2468
Labeling, defined.

Labeling means the process of preparing and affixing a label to any drug container or device container, exclusive of the labeling by a manufacturer, packager, or distributor of a nonprescription drug or commercially packaged legend drug or device. Any such label shall include all information required by section 71-2479 and federal law or regulation. Compliance with labeling requirements under federal law for devices described in subsection (2) of section 38-2841, medical gases, and medical gas devices constitutes compliance with state law and regulations for purposes of this section. Labeling does not include affixing an auxiliary sticker or other such notation to a container after a drug has been dispensed when the sticker or notation is affixed by a person credentialed under the Uniform Credentialing Act in a facility licensed under the Health Care Facility Licensure Act.

Laws 2015, LB37, § 12;

Laws 2020, LB1052, § 15.

Health Care Facility Licensure Act, see section 71-401.

Uniform Credentialing Act, see section 38-101.